Massachusetts, session 194th, H13.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “plowing” in line 56, the
following words:- “, snow hauling, and snow removal”.
of 1